Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-818
Seeking or receiving special advantages; when unlawful; penalty.

If any joint-stock company, corporation, limited liability company, or combination or any agent thereof solicits, accepts, or receives any such rebate, concession, or service as is hereinbefore declared to be unlawful, it shall be unlawful thereafter to transport within this state any article owned or controlled by such company, corporation, limited liability company, or combination, or produced or manufactured by it, by whomsoever the same may be owned or controlled. If any such joint-stock company, corporation, limited liability company, or combination offers, grants, or gives any special prices, inducements, or advantages for the sale of articles produced, manufactured, owned, or controlled by it to purchasers in any particular locality in order to restrict or destroy competition in that locality in the sale of such articles, it shall be unlawful thereafter to transport within this state any article owned or controlled by it, or produced or manufactured by it, by whomsoever the same may be owned or controlled. The prohibition imposed under this section shall not apply to any article purchased bona fide before decree made in pursuance thereof against the joint-stock company, corporation, limited liability company, or combination producing, manufacturing, or theretofore owning or controlling the same, and even after decree, any such article may be relieved from the prohibition imposed under this section if the owner thereof shows to the satisfaction of the court having jurisdiction of the matter hereinafter provided that such article was purchased bona fide, without notice, and within thirty days after the entry of such decree. Any transportation company, and any officer, agent, or representative thereof, knowingly concerned in the transportation of articles within this state, contrary to the prohibitions of this section, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars.

Laws 1905, c. 162, § 15, p. 642;

R.S.1913, § 4059;

C.S.1922, § 3462;

C.S.1929, § 59-815;

R.S.1943, § 59-818;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 372.